Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0307

Amendment or restatement of articles of organization—Filing.

(1) To amend its articles of organization, a limited cooperative association must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment of the articles, or restated articles of organization, which contain one or more amendments of the articles of organization, stating:

(a) The name of the association;

(b) The date of filing of the association's initial articles; and

(c) The text of the amendment.

(2) Before the beginning of the initial meeting of the board of directors, an organizer who knows that information in the filed articles of organization was inaccurate when the articles were filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

(a) Cause the articles to be amended; or

(b) If appropriate, deliver an amendment to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to RCW 23.95.110(2).

(3) To restate its articles of organization, a limited cooperative association must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a restatement designated as such in its heading.

(4) Upon filing, an amendment of the articles of organization or other record containing an amendment of the articles which has been properly adopted by the members is effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2019 c 37 s 307.]